Hawaii, session 2026, HB1827.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 291E-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1. By amending the definition of "measurable amount of alcohol" to read: ""Measurable amount of alcohol" means a test result [equal]: (1)  Equal to or greater than .02 but less than [.08] .05 grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters or cubic centimeters of blood; or [equal] (2)  Equal to or greater than .02 but less than [.08] .05 grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of breath." 2. By amending the definition of "under the influence" to read: ""Under the influence" means that a person: (1)  Is under the influence of alcohol in an amount sufficient to impair the person's normal mental faculties or ability to care for the person and guard against casualty; (2)  Is under the influence of any drug that impairs the person's ability to operate the vehicle in a careful and prudent manner; (3)  Has [.08] .05 or more grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of the person's breath; or (4)  Has [.08] .05 or more grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters or cubic centimeters of the person's blood." SECTION 2.  Section 291E-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  In any criminal prosecution for a violation of section 291E-61 or 291E-61.5 or in any proceeding under part III: (1)  [.08] .05 or more grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters or cubic centimeters of the person's blood; (2)  [.08] .05 or more grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of the person's breath; or (3)  The presence of one or more drugs in an amount sufficient to impair the person's ability to operate a vehicle in a careful and prudent manner, within three hours after the time of the alleged violation as shown by chemical analysis or other approved analytical techniques of the person's blood, breath, or urine shall be competent evidence that the person was under the influence of an intoxicant at the time of the alleged violation." SECTION 3.  Section 291E-35, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  In cases involving an alcohol related offense, if a test conducted in accordance with part II and section 321‑161 and the rules adopted thereunder shows that a respondent had an alcohol concentration less than [.08,] .05, the director or the arresting law enforcement agency immediately shall return the respondent's license along with a certified statement that administrative revocation proceedings have been terminated with prejudice." SECTION 4.  Section 291E-36, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  Whenever a respondent has been arrested for a violation of section 291E-61 or 291E-61.5 and submits to a test that establishes:  the respondent's alcohol concentration was [.08] .05 or more; the presence, in the respondent's blood or urine, of any drug that is capable of impairing the respondent's ability to operate a vehicle in a careful and prudent manner; or whenever a respondent has been involved in a collision resulting in injury or death and a blood or urine test performed pursuant to section 291E-21 establishes that the respondent's alcohol concentration was [.08] .05 or more or establishes the presence in the respondent's blood or urine of any drug that is capable of impairing the respondent's ability to operate a vehicle in a careful and prudent manner, the following shall be forwarded immediately to the director: (1)  A copy of the arrest report or the report of the law enforcement officer who issued the notice of administrative revocation to the person involved in a collision resulting in injury or death and the sworn statement of the arresting law enforcement officer or the officer who issued the notice of administrative revocation, stating facts that establish that: (A)  There was reasonable suspicion to stop the vehicle, the vehicle was stopped at an intoxicant control roadblock established and operated in compliance with sections 291E-19 and 291E-20, or the respondent was tested pursuant to section 291E-21; (B)  There was probable cause to believe that the respondent had been operating the vehicle while under the influence of an intoxicant; and (C)  The respondent agreed to be tested or the person was tested pursuant to section 291E-21; (2)  In a case involving an alcohol related offense, the sworn statement of the person responsible for maintenance of the testing equipment, stating facts that establish that, pursuant to section 321-161 and rules adopted thereunder: (A)  The equipment used to conduct the test was approved for use as an alcohol testing device in this State; (B)  The person had been trained and at the time the test was conducted was certified and capable of maintaining the testing equipment; and (C)  The testing equipment used had been properly maintained and was in good working condition when the test was conducted; (3)  In a case involving an alcohol related offense, the sworn statement of the person who conducted the test, stating facts that establish that, pursuant to section 321-161 and rules adopted thereunder: (A)  The person was trained and at the time the test was conducted was certified and capable of operating the testing equipment; (B)  The person followed the procedures established for conducting the test; (C)  The equipment used to conduct the test functioned in accordance with operating procedures and indicated that the respondent's alcohol concentration was at, or above, the prohibited level; and (D)  The person whose breath or blood was tested is the respondent; (4)  In a case involving a drug related offense, the sworn statement of the person responsible for maintenance of the testing equipment, stating facts that establish that, pursuant to section 321-161 and rules adopted thereunder: (A)  The equipment used to conduct the test was approved for use in drug testing; (B)  The person conducting the test had been trained and, at the time of the test, was certified and capable of maintaining the testing equipment; and (C)  The testing equipment used had been properly maintained and was in good working condition when the test was conducted; (5)  In a case involving a drug related offense, the sworn statement of the person who conducted the test, stating facts that establish that, pursuant to section 321-161 and rules adopted thereunder: (A)  At the time the test was conducted, the person was trained and capable of operating the testing equipment; (B)  The person followed the procedures established for conducting the test; (C)  The equipment used to conduct the test functioned in accordance with operating procedures and indicated the presence of one or more drugs or their metabolites in the respondent's blood or urine; and (D)  The person whose blood or urine was tested is the respondent; (6)  A copy of the notice of administrative revocation issued by the law enforcement officer to the respondent; (7)  Any license taken into possession by the law enforcement officer; and (8)  A listing of any prior alcohol or drug enforcement contacts involving the respondent." SECTION 5.  Section 291E-61, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  A person commits the offense of operating a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant if the person operates or assumes actual physical control of a vehicle: (1)  While under the influence of alcohol in an amount sufficient to impair the person's normal mental faculties or ability to care for the person and guard against casualty; (2)  While under the influence of any drug that impairs the person's ability to operate the vehicle in a careful and prudent manner; (3)  With [.08] .05 or more grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of breath; or (4)  With [.08] .05 or more grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters or cubic centimeters of blood." SECTION 6.  Section 291E-61.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  A person commits the offense of habitually operating a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant if: (1)  The person is a habitual operator of a vehicle while under the influence of an intoxicant; and (2)  The person operates or assumes actual physical control of a vehicle: (A)  While under the influence of alcohol in an amount sufficient to impair the person's normal mental faculties or ability to care for the person and guard against casualty; (B)  While under the influence of any drug that impairs the person's ability to operate the vehicle in a careful and prudent manner; (C)  With [.08] .05 or more grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of breath; or (D)  With [.08] .05 or more grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters or cubic centimeters of blood." SECTION 7.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 8.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 9.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________